Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-127
District as fiscal agent of the United States; authority.

The board may accept on behalf of the district, appointment of the district as fiscal agent of the United States, or authorization of the district by the United States to make collections of money for and on behalf of the United States in connection with any federal reclamation project, whereupon the district shall be authorized to so act and to assume the duties and liabilities incident to such action, and the board shall have full power to do any and all things required by the federal statutes in connection therewith, and all things required by the rules and regulations established by any department of the federal government in regard thereto.

Laws 1915, c. 69, § 3, p. 175;

C.S.1922, § 2866;

C.S.1929, § 46-110;

R.S.1943, § 46-127.